Utah statutes.
41-3-701.   Violations as misdemeanors.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any person who violates this chapter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(2) (a) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(a)(ii), a person who violates Section 41-3-201 is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

(ii)  A person who violates the requirement to title a vehicle with a salvage certificate within 15 days of purchasing the vehicle at a motor vehicle auction under Subsection 41-3-201(3)(e) is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.

(b)  Once a person has met the criteria for the offense of acting as a dealer without a license, each additional motor vehicle the person sells, displays for sale, offers for sale or exchange, or leases in that 12-month period without becoming licensed under Section 41-3-202 is a separate violation.

(3)  A person who violates Section 41-3-301 is guilty of a class A misdemeanor unless the selling dealer complies with the requirements of Section 41-3-403.

(4)  A person who violates Section 41-3-207.5 is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

